Utah statutes.
32A-1-304.5 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Verification of proof of age by certain
club licensees.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "applicable club licensee" means the
following as defined in Section 32A-5-101:
(a)  a dining club licensee; or
(b)  a social club licensee.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, an applicable club
licensee shall require that a person authorized to sell or otherwise handle an
alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product under the applicable club license
verify proof of age as provided in this section.
(3)  A person described in Subsection (2) is required to verify proof of age
under this section before an individual who appears to be 35 years of age or
younger:
(a)  gains admittance to the premises of a social club licensee; or
(b)  procures an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product on the premises of a
dining club licensee.
(4)  To comply with Subsection (3), a person shall:
(a)  request the individual present proof of age; and
(b) (i)  verify the validity of the proof of age electronically under the
verification program created in Subsection (5); or
(ii)  if the proof of age cannot be electronically verified as provided in
Subsection (4)(b)(i), request that the individual comply with a process
established by the commission by rule made in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(5)  The commission shall establish by rule made in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, an electronic verification
program that includes the following:
(a)  the specifications for the technology used by the applicable club
licensee to electronically verify proof of age, including that the technology
display to the person described in Subsection (2) no more than the following
for the individual who presents the proof of age:
(i)  the name;
(ii)  the age;
(iii)  the number assigned to the individual's proof of age by the issuing
authority;
(iv)  the birth date;
(v)  the gender; and
(vi)  the status and expiration date of the individual's proof of age; and
(b)  the security measures that must be used by an applicable club licensee to
ensure that information obtained under this section is:
(i)  used by the applicable club licensee only for purposes of verifying proof
of age in accordance with this section; and
(ii)  retained by the applicable club licensee for seven days after the day on
which the applicable club licensee obtains the information.
(6) (a)  An applicable club licensee may not disclose information obtained
under this section except as provided under this title.
(b)  Information obtained under this section is considered a record for any
purpose under Section 32A-5-107.
